Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Formation of Horizontal Property Regimes.

Sec. 34.07.010.
This chapter applicable only if declaration executed and recorded.

This chapter is applicable only to property, the sole owner or all of the owners of which submit it to the horizontal property regime by executing and recording a declaration under (c) of this section and AS

34.07.020

.

A declaration or any amendment to the declaration is not valid unless recorded.

The declaration shall be recorded in the recording district in which the property is located.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 25 ch 208 SLA 1975)

Sec. 34.07.020.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration must contain

a description of the land on which the building and improvement are or are to be located;

a description of the building, stating the number of stories and basements, the number of apartments and the principal materials of which it is or is to be constructed;

the apartment number of each apartment, and a statement of its location, approximate area, number of rooms, and immediate common areas to which it has access, and any other data necessary for its proper identification;

a description of the common areas and facilities;

a description of the limited common areas and facilities, if any, stating to which apartment their use is reserved;

the value of the property and of each apartment, and the percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities appertaining to each apartment and its owner for all purposes, including voting;

a statement of the purposes for which the building and each of the apartments are intended and restricted as to their use;

the name of a person to receive service of process in the cases provided for in this chapter, together with the address of the person’s residence or place of business, which shall be within the city or recording district in which the building is located;

a provision as to the percentage of votes by the apartment owners that determines whether or not to rebuild, repair, restore, or sell the property in the event of the damage or the destruction of all or a part of the property;

a provision authorizing and establishing procedures for the subdividing or combining of an apartment or apartments, common areas and facilities or limited common areas and facilities, through the use of a metes and bounds description or otherwise;

a provision requiring the adoption of bylaws for the administration of the property or for other purposes not inconsistent with this chapter that may include that the property be administered by a board of directors elected from among the apartment owners, or by a manager, or by a managing agent, or otherwise, and the procedures for the adoption and amendment of the bylaws;

any further details in connection with the property that the person executing the declaration may consider desirable to set out consistent with this chapter;

the method by which the declaration may be amended, consistent with this chapter, except that not less than 60 percent of the apartment owners may consent to any amendment; and

a reference to the file number and recording information for the floor plans of the building affected that are required to be filed and recorded simultaneously with the declaration under AS

34.07.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 8 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.07.030.
Filing and recording of survey map and floor plans with verified statement.

There shall be filed and recorded simultaneously with the recording of the declaration in the recording district in which the property is located

a survey map of the surface of the land submitted under the provisions of this chapter showing the location of the building on it;

a set of the floor plans of the building showing the layout, apartment numbers and dimensions of the apartments in sufficient detail to identify and locate each apartment with certainty, stating the name of the building or that it has no name, and bearing the verified statement of a registered architect or registered professional engineer certifying that it is an accurate copy of portions of the plans of the building as filed with and approved by the governmental entity having jurisdiction over the approval or issuance of permits for the construction of the building, or a statement that no approval or permit is required.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 9 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.07.040.
Amendment to declaration in place of verified statement by architect or engineer regarding floor plans.

If the floor plans do not include a verified statement by a registered architect or registered professional engineer that the plans fully and accurately depict the layout, apartment numbers, and dimensions of the apartments as built, there shall be recorded before the first conveyance of an apartment an amendment to the declaration to which shall be attached a verified statement of a registered architect certifying that the plans previously filed and recorded or being filed and recorded simultaneously with the amendment fully and accurately depict the layout, apartment number, and dimensions of the apartments as built.

The plans must each contain a reference to the date of recording of the declaration and the volume, page, and receiving number of the recorded declaration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 10 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.07.050.
Form of floor plans.

The recording office shall prescribe the style, size, form, and quality of floor plans filed and recorded under AS

34.07.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 11 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.07.060.
Survey map and floor plans subject to state and local laws.

The survey map and floor plans are subject to the provisions of state and local laws relating to plats, planning and plans, subdivisions, and zoning, if the laws are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter and if the building is or is to be located on land that is not owned in common.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.070.
Recording of instruments affecting horizontal property regimes.

The declaration, an amendment to it, or any instrument by which the property may be removed from this chapter and every instrument affecting the property or an apartment may be recorded.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)